apertium-en-it.it.dix
 <pardef n="equiva/lere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rremmo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrei</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rreste</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rresti</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rrebber</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrebbero</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrebbe</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rremo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrò</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrete</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrai</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>rran</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rranno</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>rrà</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lendo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lendo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lemmo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lsi</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>leste</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lesti</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>lser</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lsero</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lse</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>liamo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lete</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>lgan</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lgano</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lga</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ler</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lere</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ler</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>levamo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>levo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>levate</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>levi</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>levan</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>levano</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>leva</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lessimo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lessi</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>leste</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lessi</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>lesser</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lessero</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lesse</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lse</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lsa</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lsi</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lso</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>liamo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lgo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lete</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>lgon</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lgono</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>liamo</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lga</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>liate</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lga</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>lgan</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lgano</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lga</l>
	  <r>lere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="equivalere"><i>equiva</i><par n="equiva/lere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prevalere"><i>preva</i><par n="equiva/lere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="valere"><i>va</i><par n="equiva/lere__vblex"/></e>
